Utah statutes.
31A-15-209.   Restrictions on purchasing groups.
(1)  A purchasing group which obtains liability insurance from an insurer not
admitted in this state or from a risk retention group shall inform each of the
group members which have a risk resident or located in this state that the
risk is not protected by an insurance insolvency guaranty fund in this state,
and that the risk retention group or insurer may not be subject to all
insurance laws and regulations of this state.
(2)  A purchasing group may not purchase insurance providing for a deductible
or self-insured retention applicable to the group as a whole; however,
coverage may provide for a deductible or self-insured retention applicable to
individual members.
(3)  Purchases of insurance by purchasing groups are subject to the same
standards regarding aggregate limits which are applicable to all purchases of
group insurance.
